Washington statutes.
RCW 35.41.050

Revenue warrants.

(1) Revenue warrants may be issued and such warrants and interest thereon may be payable out of the special fund or refunded through the proceeds of the sale of revenue bonds. Every revenue warrant and the interest thereon issued against the special fund shall be a valid claim of the owner thereof only as against that fund and the amount of revenue pledged to the fund, and shall not constitute an indebtedness of the city or town. Every revenue warrant shall state on its face that it is payable from a special fund, naming it and the ordinance creating it. Such warrants may be in any form, including bearer warrants or registered warrants as provided in RCW 39.46.030.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such warrants may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1983 c 167 s 40; 1965 c 7 s 35.41.050. Prior: 1957 c 117 s 5.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.